Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB289.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 159 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A parent, guardian, or other person having custody or charge of a child subject to
compulsory attendance under this chapter shall be permitted to enroll the child as
a student in a public school district on a part-time basis for courses offered in the
district's schools. Part-time enrollment under this section may partially satisfy the
compulsory attendance requirements of this chapter. If the child is:
(a) A resident of the district, the district shall enroll the child and assign him or
her to a school subject to the same policies and procedures used in enrolling
and assigning other resident students; or
(b) Not a resident of the district, the child shall be subject to the district's
nonresident pupil policy required under Section 2 of this Act in the same
manner as other nonresident pupils.
(2) If a part-time student enrolled under this section wishes to enroll into a specific
educational program or course offered to other students by a public school:
(a) The part-time student shall be subject to the same eligibility requirements,
responsibilities, and standards as other students; and
(b) The school shall not discriminate against the student based on part-time
status in placement in a given educational program or course.
(3) A part-time student enrolled under this section may participate in school activities
and extracurricular activities in the same manner and subject to the same rules,
policies, and standards as full-time students, except that a part-time student shall
not be eligible for participation at the public school in interscholastic athletics
governed by the Kentucky Board of Education or the agency designated by the
board for the management of interscholastic athletics. A part-time student may
Page 1 of 22
XXXX 1/8/2026 4:23 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 930
retain eligibility at any nonpublic school in which the student is enrolled, subject
to the rules, policies, and standards set forth by the Kentucky Board of Education
or the agency designated by the board for the management of interscholastic
athletics.
(4) The Kentucky Board of Education shall promulgate administrative regulations in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A as necessary to carry out this section.
Section 2. KRS 158.120 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Each local[A] board of education shall adopt a nonresident pupil policy to govern
the terms under which the district shall allow enrollment of nonresident pupils.
[Upon allowing nonresident pupil enrollment, ]The policy:
(a) Shall:
1. Allow nonresident children to be eligible to enroll in any public school
located within the district;[. The policy shall ]
2. Not discriminate against any nonresident pupil on the basis of the
pupil's residential address, ability level, socioeconomic status, or status
in a protected class under state or federal law;
3. Provide preferential consideration to nonresident pupils who were
enrolled in the district in the preceding school year;[between
nonresident pupils, but may recognize enrollment capacity, as
determined by the local school district. The nonresident pupil policy and
any subsequent changes adopted by a board of education shall ]
4. Be filed, along with any subsequent changes to the policy, with the
Kentucky Department of Education no later than thirty (30) days
following their adoption; and
5. Be published on the district's website; and
(b) May provide preferential consideration to non resident pupils with a sibling
enrolled in the district.
Page 2 of 22
XXXX 1/8/2026 4:23 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 930
(2) (a) Any local board of education may charge a reasonable tuition fee per month
for each child attending its schools if:
1. The child's[whose] parent, guardian, or other legal custodian is not a
bona fide resident of the district; and
2. The board of education of the school district in which the pupil resides
does not make provision for the child's education within that district.
A tuition fee is charged under this paragraph shall be paid by the board of
education of the school district in which the pupil resides.
(b) A local board of education shall not charge a tuition fee for a nonresident
child attending its schools when the board of education of the school district
in which the pupil resides is not required to pay the fee.
(c) Any controversy as to a tuition[the] fee shall be submitted to the Kentucky
Board of Education for final settlement.[ The fee shall be paid by the board of
education of the school district in which the pupil resides, except in cases
where the board makes provision for the child's education within his or her
district.] If a board of education is required to pay a pupil's tuition fee, the
pupil shall be admitted to a school only upon proper certificate of the local
board of education of the school district in which he or she resides.
(3) When it appears to the board of education of any school district that it is convenient
for a pupil of any grade residing in that district to attend an approved public school
in another district, the board of education may enter into a tuition contract with the
public school authorities of the other school district for that purpose, but before a
contract is entered into with public school authorities in another state the school
shall have been approved by the state school authorities of that state through the
grades in which the pupil belongs. When a district undertakes, under operation of a
tuition contract or of law, to provide in its school for pupils residing in another
district, the district of their residence shall share the total cost of the school,
Page 3 of 22
XXXX 1/8/2026 4:23 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 930
including transportation when furnished at public expense, in proportion to the
number of pupils or in accordance with contract agreement between the two (2)
boards.
(4) Each school district shall:
(a) Determine the capacity of each grade level for each school; and
(b) Be responsible for posting the number of available seats remaining for each
grade and for each school on the district's website by August 1 of each year,
and for providing updated information by October 1, January 1, and March
1 of each year.
(5) (a) The Kentucky Board of Education shall develop and publish a nonresident
pupil enrollment application form to be utilized by parents or guardians of
pupils seeking enrollment as a nonresident pupil in a particular school
district under this section.
(b) The parent or guardian of a pupil seeking enrollment shall submit a
completed application form to the local board of education of the district in
which the pupil seeks to be enrolled.
(c) Within fifteen (15) calendar days of the receipt of a completed nonresident
pupil enrollment application, a local board of education or a designee
appointed by the board to manage nonresident pupil enrollment shall
provide written notification to the applicant of the approval or disapproval
of the application. If the local board of education or designee disapproves
an application, the written notification shall include the applicable basis for
the disapproval and the evidence substantially relied upon to reach that
decision. A disapproval shall be based only upon the following:
1. The pupil has been expelled from a school or district where the pupil
was previously enrolled;
2. The pupil has a documented history of significant disciplinary issues
Page 4 of 22
XXXX 1/8/2026 4:23 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 930
resulting in disciplinary actions being taken against him or her;
3. The pupil has a documented history as a habitual truant under KRS
159.150;
4. The pupil has a document history of chronic absenteeism defined as a
student missing ten percent (10%) or more of yearly school time for
excused or unexcused reasons throughout the school year; or
5. There is insufficient capacity at the requested school in the requested
grade level.
(d) Within thirty (30) calendar days of receiving written notification of
disapproval of an application, an applicant may appeal the disapproval to
the Kentucky Board of Education. Upon appeal, an administrative hearing
shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.
(6) As used in this subsection, "virtual program" has the same meaning as in KRS
157.320. A school district may enroll nonresident pupils on a full-time basis in
kindergarten through grade twelve (12) in a virtual program established under KRS
158.100 by that district. Nonresident pupil enrollment shall be subject to the
following requirements:
(a) Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, the statewide total enrollment of
nonresident pupils in virtual programs offered by school districts shall not
exceed an enrollment cap of one percent (1%) of the previous year's total
statewide student enrollment in all school districts. By July 1, 2025, and each
year thereafter until June 30, 2028, the Kentucky Department of Education
shall publish on its website the previous year's total statewide student
enrollment in all school districts and the one percent (1%) value of that
number. The information shall remain on the website for the remainder of
each school year;
(b) Each school district shall report in the student information system the
Page 5 of 22
XXXX 1/8/2026 4:23 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 930
nonresident pupils enrolled in the district's virtual programs. The department
shall monitor the number of statewide total enrollment of nonresident pupils
in virtual programs;
(c) If the number of statewide total enrollment of nonresident pupils in virtual
programs reaches eighty-five hundredths of one percent (0.85%) of the
previous year's total statewide student enrollment in all school districts, the
department shall alert all school districts operating virtual programs that the
nonresident enrollment cap has almost been reached. Upon receiving the alert,
a school district shall notify any nonresident pupil seeking enrollment in a
virtual program operated by the school district that the pupil will be
provisionally enrolled until the department can confirm that the pupil's
enrollment would not exceed the enrollment cap, and shall report the pupil as
provisionally enrolled in the student information system. If the department
determines that a pupil's enrollment would exceed the enrollment cap, the
department shall notify the school district that the pupil cannot be approved
for enrollment due to the enrollment cap. The department shall determine
whether the pupil's enrollment will exceed the enrollment cap and provide
notice to the school district of the determination. If the department fails to
provide the school district with the determination within two (2) business
days, the pupil shall be deemed to not exceed the enrollment cap and the
provisional status shall be removed;
(d) If the nonresident enrollment cap is reached, the department shall notify all
school districts operating virtual programs and that no additional nonresident
pupils shall be enrolled until such time as nonresident enrollment falls below
the enrollment cap;
(e) After reaching the nonresident enrollment cap, if the number of statewide total
enrollment of nonresident pupils in virtual programs falls back below the
Page 6 of 22
XXXX 1/8/2026 4:23 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 930
enrollment cap, the department shall notify all school districts operating
virtual programs that nonresident enrollment may resume again, but any
nonresident pupils enrolled for the remainder of the school year shall be
provisionally enrolled, following the same process outlined in paragraph (c)
of this subsection; and
(f) The nonresident enrollment cap established in this subsection shall not apply
to any of the following pupils:
1. A sibling of a pupil already enrolled into the same virtual program;
2. A pupil who is a dependent of a member of the Armed Forces of the
United States; or
3. A pupil with a medical condition for which enrolling into the virtual
program may be beneficial to the pupil, which shall be evidenced in a
written statement signed by the pupil's physician.
All documentation related to these exceptions to the nonresident enrollment
cap shall be maintained by the school district enrolling the nonresident pupil
as part of the pupil's official record.
(7)[(5)] A school district operating a virtual program that enrolls nonresident pupils
shall no longer continue the enrollment of nonresident pupils in the program after
June 30, 2028, unless explicit permission to do so is provided by the General
Assembly.
(8) (a) Each school district shall:
1. Report in the student information system and to the Kentucky
Department of Education the nonresident pupils enrolled in the
district; and
2. Report to the Kentucky Department of Education by June 1 of each
year the number of nonresident pupil enrollment applications
received, the number of approvals and disapprovals of submitted
Page 7 of 22
XXXX 1/8/2026 4:23 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 930
applications, and the basis provided to the applicant for each
disapproval.
(b) The Kentucky Department of Education shall compile the information
submitted by each school district under paragraph (a) of this subsection
and publish a report on its website by July 1 of each year detailing the
nonresident pupil enrollment in each district, as well as statewide
information on the number of applicants for nonresident pupil enrollment,
the number of approvals and disapprovals, and a breakdown of the basis
provided by the district for disapproval.
(9) The Kentucky Board of Education shall promulgate administrative regulations in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A as necessary to carry out this section.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 158 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Attendance percentage" means the proportion of student attendance days
during the school year in which a student was in attendance or was absent
with a valid excuse;
(b) "Eligible local district" means a local school district enrolling nonresident
pupils who are not subject to a tuition fee under Section 2 of this Act;
(c) "Local per pupil revenue":
1. Means the per pupil calculation, using the average daily attendance
for the prior year, of:
a. All taxes and payments in lieu of taxes collected by a local
government and transferred to a local school district, except
funds excluded pursuant to subparagraph 2. of this paragraph;
and
b. All taxes and payments in lieu of taxes levied and collected by a
Page 8 of 22
XXXX 1/8/2026 4:23 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 930
local school district, except funds excluded pursuant to
subparagraph 2. of this paragraph; and
2. Does not include:
a. A local capital outlay funds that are restricted in use pursuant to
KRS 157.420(4); and
b. Funds under KRS 157.440(1)(b) and 157.621 necessary to meet
debt service obligations on bonds or other financing mechanisms
for new construction and renovation projects for school
facilities; and
(d) "Qualifying nonresident pupil" means a nonresident pupil enrolled in an
eligible local district.
(2) To the extent funds are appropriated by the General Assembly to support
nonresident pupil enrollment, the Kentucky Department of Education shall
distribute to eligible local districts all general funds designated to support
nonresident pupil enrollment, as follows:
(a) On or before June 30 of each year, funds to support nonresident pupil
enrollment shall be divided and allocated to each eligible local district based
on that district's proportionate share of credits compared to the statewide
total number of credits; and
(b) To calculate an eligible local district's share of credits, the department shall
create a formula that:
1. Calculates the difference in local per pupil revenue raised during the
prior year between a qualifying nonresident pupil's district of
residence and district of enrollment;
2. Does not award credits when the local per pupil revenue of the pupil's
district of residence exceeds the local per pupil revenue of the pupil's
district of enrollment;
Page 9 of 22
XXXX 1/8/2026 4:23 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 930
3. Determines the credit amount for each qualifying nonresident pupil by
multiplying the attendance percentage of each qualifying nonresident
pupil by the calculated difference in local per pupil revenue between
the district of residence and the district of enrollment; and
4. Adds together the credit amount for each qualifying nonresident pupil
within an eligible local district to determine the total credits for the
eligible local district.
(3) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (2) of this section, two (2) or more
eligible local districts may enter into an agreement to provide nonresident pupil
enrollment for students of those districts subject to the agreement and set the
tuition fee to be charged, if any, if the tuition fee is charged to the applicable local
board of education consistent with subsection (3) of Section 2 of this Act. Eligible
local districts electing to enter into agreements for nonresident pupil enrollment
shall not be eligible for state funds for the support of nonresident pupil
enrollment for students of the districts subject to the agreement.
Section 4. KRS 157.350 is amended to read as follows:
Each district which meets the following requirements shall be eligible to share in the
distribution of funds from the fund to support education excellence in Kentucky:
(1) Employs and compensates all teachers for not less than one hundred eighty-five
(185) days. The Kentucky Board of Education, upon recommendation of the
commissioner of education, shall prescribe procedures by which this requirement
may be reduced during any year for any district which employs teachers for less
than one hundred and eighty-five (185) days, in which case the eligibility of a
district for participation in the public school fund shall be in proportion to the
length of time teachers actually are employed;
(2) Operates all schools for a minimum school term as provided in KRS 158.070 and
administrative regulations of the Kentucky Board of Education. If the school term is
Page 10 of 22
XXXX 1/8/2026 4:23 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 930
less than one hundred eighty-five (185) days, including not less than one hundred
seventy (170) student attendance days as defined in KRS 158.070 or one thousand
sixty-two (1,062) hours of instructional time, for any reason not approved by the
Kentucky Board of Education on recommendation of the commissioner, the
eligibility of a district for participation in the public school fund shall be in
proportion to the length of term the schools actually operate;
(3) Compensates all teachers on the basis of a single salary schedule and in conformity
with the provisions of KRS 157.310 to 157.440;
(4) Includes no nonresident pupils in its average daily attendance, except:
(a) [1. Until July 1, 2022, pupils listed under a written agreement, which may
be for multiple years, with the district of the pupils' legal residence.
2. If an agreement cannot be reached, either board may appeal to the
commissioner for settlement of the dispute.
3. The commissioner shall have thirty (30) days to resolve the dispute.
Either board may appeal the commissioner's decision to the Kentucky
Board of Education.
4. The commissioner and the Kentucky Board of Education shall consider
the factors affecting the districts, including but not limited to academic
[performance and the impact on programs, school facilities,
transportation, and staffing of the districts.
5. The Kentucky Board of Education shall have sixty (60) days to approve
or amend the decision of the commissioner;
(b) Beginning July 1, 2022, ]Those nonresident pupils admitted pursuant to
district nonresident pupil policies adopted under Section 2 of this Act[KRS
158.120]; and
(b)[(c)] A nonresident pupil who attends a district in which a parent of the pupil
is employed[. All tuition fees required of a nonresident pupil may be waived
Page 11 of 22
XXXX 1/8/2026 4:23 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 930
for a pupil who meets the requirements of this paragraph].
This subsection does not apply to those pupils enrolled in an approved class
conducted in a hospital and pupils who have been expelled for behavioral reasons
who shall be counted in average daily attendance under KRS 157.320;
(5) Any secondary school which maintains a basketball team for boys for other than
intramural purposes, shall maintain the same program for girls;
(6) Any school district which fails to comply with subsection (5) of this section shall be
prohibited from participating in varsity competition in any sport for one (1) year.
Determination of failure to comply shall be made by the Department of Education
after a hearing requested by any person within the school district. The hearing shall
be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B. A district under this subsection
shall, at the hearing, have an opportunity to show inability to comply.
Section 5. KRS 156.070 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky Board of Education shall have the management and control of the
common schools and all programs operated in these schools, including
interscholastic athletics, the Kentucky School for the Deaf, the Kentucky School for
the Blind, and community education programs and services.
(2) The Kentucky Board of Education may designate an organization or agency to
manage interscholastic athletics in the common schools, provided that the rules,
regulations, and bylaws of any organization or agency so designated shall be
approved by the board, and provided further that any administrative hearing
conducted by the designated managing organization or agency shall be conducted in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.
(a) The state board or its designated agency shall assure through promulgation of
administrative regulations that if a secondary school sponsors or intends to
sponsor an athletic activity or sport that is similar to a sport for which
National Collegiate Athletic Association members offer an athletic
Page 12 of 22
XXXX 1/8/2026 4:23 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 930
scholarship, the school shall sponsor the athletic activity or sport for which a
scholarship is offered. The administrative regulations shall specify which
athletic activities are similar to sports for which National Collegiate Athletic
Association members offer scholarships.
(b) Beginning with the 2003-2004 school year, the state board shall require any
agency or organization designated by the state board to manage interscholastic
athletics to adopt bylaws that establish as members of the agency's or
organization's board of control one (1) representative of nonpublic member
schools who is elected by the nonpublic school members of the agency or
organization from regions one (1) through eight (8) and one (1) representative
of nonpublic member schools who is elected by the nonpublic member
schools of the agency or organization from regions nine (9) through sixteen
(16). The nonpublic school representatives on the board of control shall not be
from classification A1 or D1 schools. Following initial election of these
nonpublic school representatives to the agency's or organization's board of
control, terms of the nonpublic school representatives shall be staggered so
that only one (1) nonpublic school member is elected in each even-numbered
year.
(c) The state board or any agency designated by the state board to manage
interscholastic athletics shall not promulgate rules, administrative regulations,
or by laws that prohibit pupils in grades seven (7) to eight (8) from
participating in any high school sports except for high school varsity soccer,
football, and boys or coed lacrosse, or from participating on more than one (1)
school-sponsored team at the same time in the same sport. The Kentucky
Board of Education, or an agency designated by the board to manage
interscholastic athletics, may promulgate administrative regulations
restricting, limiting, or prohibiting participation in high school varsity soccer
Page 13 of 22
XXXX 1/8/2026 4:23 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 930
and football for students who have not successfully completed the eighth
grade.
(d) 1. The state board or any agency designated by the state board to manage
interscholastic athletics shall allow a member school's team or students
to play against students of a nonmember at-home private school, or a
team of students from nonmember at-home private schools, if the
nonmember at-home private schools and students comply with this
subsection.
2. A nonmember at-home private school's team and students shall comply
with the rules for student-athletes, including rules concerning:
a. Age;
b. School semesters;
c. Scholarships;
d. Physical exams;
e. Foreign student eligibility; and
f. Amateurs.
3. A coach of a nonmember at-home private school's team shall comply
with the rules concerning certification of member school coaches as
required by the state board or any agency designated by the state board
to manage interscholastic athletics.
4. This subsection shall not allow a nonmember at-home private school's
team to participate in a sanctioned:
a. Conference;
b. Conference tournament;
c. District tournament;
d. Regional tournament; or
e. State tournament or event.
Page 14 of 22
XXXX 1/8/2026 4:23 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 930
5. This subsection does not allow eligibility for a recognition, award, or
championship sponsored by the state board or any agency designated by
the state board to manage interscholastic athletics.
6. A nonmember at-home private school's team or students may participate
in interscholastic athletics permitted, offered, or sponsored by the state
board or any agency designated by the state board to manage
interscholastic athletics.
(e) 1. Every local board of education shall require an annual medical
examination performed and signed by a physician, physician assistant,
advanced practice registered nurse, or chiropractor, if performed within
the professional's scope of practice, for each student seeking eligibility
to participate in any school athletic activity or sport.
2. Any interscholastic athletics participation consent form that is adopted
by the Kentucky Board of Education or any organization or agency
designated by the state board to manage interscholastic athletics shall
include the following information:
a. A student-athlete may report instances of child dependency,
neglect, and abuse to any adult;
b. Any person who knows or has reasonable cause to believe that a
child is dependent, neglected, or abused shall report that
information pursuant to KRS 620.030; and
c. References to instructions on reporting child dependency, neglect,
and abuse, including KRS 620.030.
3. The Kentucky Board of Education or any organization or agency
designated by the state board to manage interscholastic athletics shall
include the following information in any training for administrators and
coaches under its jurisdiction:
Page 15 of 22
XXXX 1/8/2026 4:23 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 930
a. The duty to report instances of child dependency, neglect, and
abuse; and
b. Procedures for reporting child dependency, neglect, and abuse
under KRS 620.030.
4. The Kentucky Board of Education or any organization or agency
designated by the state board to manage interscholastic athletics shall
not promulgate administrative regulations or adopt any policies or
bylaws that are contrary to the provisions of this paragraph.
(f) Any student who turns nineteen (19) years of age prior to August 1 shall not
be eligible for high school athletics in Kentucky. Any student who turns
nineteen (19) years of age on or after August 1 shall remain eligible for that
school year only. An exception to the provisions of this paragraph shall be
made, and the student shall be eligible for high school athletics in Kentucky if
the student:
1. Qualified for exceptional children services and had an individual
education program developed by an admissions and release committee
(ARC) while the student was enrolled in the primary school program;
2. Was retained in the primary school program because of an ARC
committee recommendation; and
3. Has not completed four (4) consecutive years or eight (8) consecutive
semesters of eligibility following initial promotion from grade eight (8)
to grade nine (9).
(g) The state board or any agency designated by the state board to manage
interscholastic athletics shall promulgate administrative regulations or bylaws
that provide that:
1. A member school shall designate all athletic teams, activities, and sports
for students in grades six (6) through twelve (12) as one (1) of the
Page 16 of 22
XXXX 1/8/2026 4:23 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 930
following categories:
a. "Boys";
b. "Coed"; or
c. "Girls";
2. The sex of a student for the purpose of determining eligibility to
participate in an athletic activity or sport shall be determined by:
a. A student's biological sex as indicated on the student's original,
unedited birth certificate issued at the time of birth; or
b. An affidavit signed and sworn to by the physician, physician
assistant, advanced practice registered nurse, or chiropractor that
conducted the annual medical examination required by paragraph
(e) of this subsection under penalty of perjury establishing the
student's biological sex at the time of birth;
3. a. An athletic activity or sport designated as "girls" for students in
grades six (6) through twelve (12) shall not be open to members of
the male sex.
b. Nothing in this section shall be construed to restrict the eligibility
of any student to participate in an athletic activity or sport
designated as "boys" or "coed"; and
4. Neither the state board, any agency designated by the state board to
manage interscholastic athletics, any school district, nor any member
school shall entertain a complaint, open an investigation, or take any
other adverse action against a school for maintaining separate
interscholastic or intramural athletic teams, activities, or sports for
students of the female sex.
(h) 1. The state board or any agency designated by the state board to manage
interscholastic athletics shall promulgate administrative regulations that
Page 17 of 22
XXXX 1/8/2026 4:23 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 930
permit a school district to employ or assign nonteaching or noncertified
personnel or personnel without postsecondary education credit hours to
serve in a coaching position. The administrative regulations shall give
preference to the hiring or assignment of certified personnel in coaching
positions.
2. A person employed in a coaching position shall be a high school
graduate and at least twenty-one (21) years of age and shall submit to a
criminal background check in accordance with KRS 160.380.
3. The administrative regulations shall specify post-hire requirements for
persons employed in coaching positions.
4. The regulations shall permit a predetermined number of hours of
professional development training approved by the state board or its
designated agency to be used in lieu of postsecondary education credit
hour requirements.
5. A local school board may specify post-hire requirements for personnel
employed in coaching positions in addition to those specified in
subparagraph 3. of this paragraph.
(i) Unless permitted to be eligible for varsity athletics by any transfer rule,
policy, or administrative regulation promulgated by the state board or any
agency designated by the state board to manage interscholastic athletics, any
student who transfers enrollment from a district of residence to a nonresident
district under KRS 157.350(4)(a)[(b)] after enrolling in grade nine (9) and
participating in a varsity sport shall be ineligible to participate in
interscholastic athletics for one (1) calendar year from the date of the transfer.
The state board or any agency designated by the state board to manage
interscholastic athletics may adopt rules, policies, and bylaws and promulgate
administrative regulations necessary to carry out this paragraph.
Page 18 of 22
XXXX 1/8/2026 4:23 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 930
(j) No member school shall grant a student-athlete the right to use the member
school's property, or intellectual property, such as trademarks, school
uniforms, and copyrights, in the student's earning of compensation through
name, image, and likeness activities. No student-athlete shall use school
property or such intellectual property in earning compensation through name,
image, and likeness activities. The state board or any agency designated by
the state board to manage interscholastic athletics shall promulgate
administrative regulations to govern and enforce this paragraph.
(3) (a) The Kentucky Board of Education is hereby authorized to lease from the State
Property and Buildings Commission or others, whether public or private, any
lands, buildings, structures, installations, and facilities suitable for use in
establishing and furthering television and related facilities as an aid or
supplement to classroom instruction throughout the Commonwealth and for
incidental use in any other proper public functions. The lease may be for any
initial term commencing with the date of the lease and ending with the next
ensuing June 30, which is the close of the then-current fiscal biennium of the
Commonwealth, with exclusive options in favor of the board to renew the
same for successive ensuing bienniums, July 1 in each even year to June 30 in
the next ensuing even year; and the rentals may be fixed at the sums in each
biennium, if renewed, sufficient to enable the State Property and Buildings
Commission to pay therefrom the maturing principal of and interest on, and
provide reserves for, any revenue bonds which the State Property and
Buildings Commission may determine to be necessary and sufficient, in
agreement with the board, to provide the cost of acquiring the television and
related facilities with appurtenances and costs as may be incident to the
issuance of the bonds.
(b) Each option of the Kentucky Board of Education to renew the lease for a
Page 19 of 22
XXXX 1/8/2026 4:23 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 930
succeeding biennial term may be exercised at any time after the adjournment
of the session of the General Assembly at which appropriations shall have
been made for the operation of the state government for such succeeding
biennial term, by notifying the State Property and Buildings Commission in
writing, signed by the chief state school officer, and delivered to the secretary
of the Finance and Administration Cabinet as a member of the commission.
The option shall be deemed automatically exercised, and the lease
automatically renewed for the succeeding biennium, effective on the first day
thereof, unless a written notice of the board's election not to renew shall have
been delivered in the office of the secretary of the Finance and Administration
Cabinet before the close of business on the last working day in April
immediately preceding the beginning of the succeeding biennium.
(c) The Kentucky Board of Education shall not itself operate leased television
facilities, or undertake the preparation of the educational presentations or
films to be transmitted thereby, but may enter into one (1) or more contracts
to provide therefor, with any public agency and instrumentality of the
Commonwealth having, or able to provide, a staff with proper technical
qualifications, upon which agency and instrumentality the board, through the
chief state school officer and the Department of Education, is represented in
such manner as to coordinate matters of curriculum with the curricula
prescribed for the public schools of the Commonwealth. Any contract for the
operation of the leased television or related facilities may permit limited and
special uses of the television or related facilities for other programs in the
public interest, subject to the reasonable terms and conditions as the board and
the operating agency and instrumentality may agree upon; but any contract
shall affirmatively forbid the use of the television or related facilities, at any
time or in any manner, in the dissemination of political propaganda or in
Page 20 of 22
XXXX 1/8/2026 4:23 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 930
furtherance of the interest of any political party or candidate for public office,
or for commercial advertising. No lease between the board and the State
Property and Buildings Commission shall bind the board to pay rentals for
more than one (1) fiscal biennium at a time, subject to the aforesaid renewal
options. The board may receive and may apply to rental payments under any
lease and to the cost of providing for the operation of the television or related
facilities not only appropriations which may be made to it from state funds,
from time to time, but also contributions, gifts, matching funds, devises, and
bequests from any source, whether federal or state, and whether public or
private, so long as the same are not conditioned upon any improper use of the
television or related facilities in a manner inconsistent with the provisions of
this subsection.
(4) The state board may, on the recommendation and with the advice of the chief state
school officer, prescribe, print, publish, and distribute at public expense such
administrative regulations, courses of study, curriculums, bulletins, programs,
outlines, reports, and placards as each deems necessary for the efficient
management, control, and operation of the schools and programs under its
jurisdiction. All administrative regulations published or distributed by the board
shall be enclosed in a booklet or binder on which the words "informational copy"
shall be clearly stamped or printed.
(5) Upon the recommendation of the chief state school officer or his or her designee,
the state board shall establish policy or act on all matters relating to programs,
services, publications, capital construction and facility renovation, equipment,
litigation, contracts, budgets, and all other matters which are the administrative
responsibility of the Department of Education.
(6) On or after June 27, 2025, the state board shall not impose any new reporting
requirement upon public schools or public school districts that is not expressly
Page 21 of 22
XXXX 1/8/2026 4:23 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 930
authorized by state statute or federal law.
Section 6. (1) No later than August 1, 2027, each school district shall
report in the student information system and to the Kentucky Department of Education
the nonresident pupils enrolled in the district during the 2026-2027 school year. Each
school district shall also report to the Kentucky Department of Education the amount of
tuition charged to nonresident pupils enrolled in the district, the number of nonresident
pupil enrollment applications received, and the number of approvals and disapprovals of
submitted applications.
(2) No later than October 1, 2027, the Kentucky Department of Education shall
compile the information required by this section and submit a report to the Legislative
Research Commission for referral to the appropriate Interim Joint Committee on
Education.
Section 7. Sections 2 to 5 of this Act take effect July 1, 2028.
Page 22 of 22
XXXX 1/8/2026 4:23 PM Jacketed